fr: Application de l’anémomètre: Industriel; Météorologique; Autre
zh-TW: 風速計應用: 工業; 氣象; 其他
it: Applicazione dell’anemometro: Industriale; Meteorologico; Altro
sk-SK: Aplikácia anemometra: Priemyselný; Meteorologický; Iné
tr: Rüzgarölçer uygulaması: Endüstriyel; Meteorolojik; Diğer
nl: Toepassing anemometer: Industrieel; Meteorologisch; Andere
vi: Ứng dụng máy đo gió: Công nghiệp; Khí tượng học; Khác
ja: 風速計の用途: 産業; 気象用; その他
sl-SI: Uporaba anemometra: Industrijski; Meteorološki; Drugo
da: Anvendelse af anemometer: Industri; Meteorologisk; Andet
ro-RO: Aplicații anemometru: Industrial; Meteorologic; Altele
zh-CN: 风速计应用: 工业; 气象; 其他
cs: Aplikace anemometru: Průmyslový; Meteorologické; Jiné
pt-PT: Aplicação de anemómetro: Industrial; Meteorológico; Outro
sv: Tillämpning för vindmätare: Industriell; Meteorologisk; Övrigt
hu: Anemométer használata: Ipari; Meteorológiai; Egyéb
el: Εφαρμογή ανεμόμετρου: Βιομηχανικό; Μετεωρολογικό; Άλλο
nb: Bruk av anemometer: Industriell; Meteorologisk; Annet
ko: 풍속계 적용: 인더스트리얼; 기상용; 기타
fi: Tuulimittarisovellus: Teollinen; Meteorologinen; Muu
th: การใช้งานเครื่องวัดความเร็วลม: อุตสาหกรรม; ทางอุตุนิยมวิทยา; อื่นๆ
es: Aplicación del anemómetro: Industrial; Meteorológico; Otros
en: Anemometer application: Industrial; Meteorological; Other
pl: Zastosowanie anemometru: Przemysłowy; Meteorologiczny; Inne
ru: Сфера применения анемометра: Промышленный; Метеорологический; Другой
de: Anwendung des Anemometers: Industriell; Meteorologisch; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Anemometro paskirtis: Pramoninis; Meteorologinis; Kita
hr-HR: Primjena anemometra: Industrijski; Meteorološki; Ostalo
pt-BR: Aplicação de anemômetro: Industrial; Meteorológico; Outro
bg-BG: Приложение на анемометър: Индустриален; Метеорологичен; Други